Maryland, session 2026, HB0598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 14–308 of Article – Health Occupations of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be repealed.
SECTION 1. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
OF MARYLAND, That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
14–321.
14–302.
Subject to the rules, regulations, and orders of the Board, the following individuals
may practice medicine without a license:
(2) A physician licensed by and residing in another jurisdiction, if the
physician:
(iii) Is engaged in clinical training or participates in training or
teaching of a skill or procedure in a hospital if:
4. The visiting physician [has]:
A. HAS no history of any medical disciplinary action in any
other state, territory, nation, or any branch of the uniformed services or the U.S.
Department of Veterans Affairs, UNLESS THE DISCIPLINARY ACTION HAS BEEN
SATISFIED AND THE BOARD CONSIDERS THAT THE BEHAVIOR FOR WHICH THE
DISCIPLINARY ACTION WAS IMPOSED HAS BEEN SUFFICIENTLY CORRECTED; and
[has]
B. HAS no significant detrimental malpractice history;
14–306.
(g) (1) (iii) “Supervised medical graduate” means an individual who:
1. Has a degree of:
B. Doctor of osteopathy from a school of osteopathy in the
United States, its territories or possessions, [Puerto Rico,] or Canada that has standards

HOUSE BILL 598 3
for graduation equivalent to those established by the American Osteopathic Association;
and
14–307.
(d) Except as provided in § 14–308 of this subtitle, the applicant shall:
(2) (i) Have a degree of doctor of osteopathy from a school of osteopathy
in the United States, its territories or possessions, [Puerto Rico,] or Canada that has
standards for graduation equivalent to those established by the American Osteopathic
Association; and
14–308.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMUNITY SPONSOR” MAY INCLUDE:
(I) A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER;
(II) A RURAL HEALTH CLINIC;
(III) A COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER;
(IV) A GROUP PRACTICE WITH AT LEAST TWO LICENSED
PHYSICIANS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE BOARD;
(V) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT; AND
(VI) A NONPROFIT CLINIC SERVING UNDERSERVED
POPULATIONS.
(3) “FACILITY” MEANS:
(I) A HEALTH SYSTEM, HOSPITAL, HOSPITAL–BASED FACILITY,
FREESTANDING EMERGENCY FACILITY, OR URGENT CARE CLINIC THAT:
1. HAS AN ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE
MEDICAL EDUCATION OR AMERICAN OSTEOPATHIC ASSOCIATION RESIDENCY
PROGRAM; OR
2. IS AFFILIATED WITH THE ACCREDITATION COUNCIL
FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION OR THE AMERICAN OSTEOPATHIC
ASSOCIATION;

HOUSE BILL 598
(II) A SCHOOL OF MEDICINE;
(III) THE NATIONAL INSTITUTES FOR HEALTH; OR
(IV) A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER.
(4) “FOREIGN COUNTRY” MEANS A COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE
UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, OR CANADA.
(5) “SOLO PRACTICE” MEANS PRIVATE, INDEPENDENT PRACTICE IN
WHICH A PHYSICIAN OPERATES WITHOUT PARTNERS OR EMPLOYMENT
AFFILIATIONS WITH OTHER ORGANIZATIONS.
(6) “STATE STANDARD OF CARE ASSESSMENT” MEANS AN EXAM
APPROVED BY THE BOARD TO ASSESS CLINICAL JUDGMENT, MANAGEMENT OF
COMPLICATIONS, UNDERSTANDING OF APPROPRIATE COLLABORATION AND
REFERRAL PRACTICES, AND ETHICAL STANDARDS, AND DEMONSTRATING THE
ABILITY TO CONSTRUCT AND EXECUTE SAFE, APPROPRIATE TREATMENT PLANS,
INCLUDING ORAL THEORY AND PRACTICE SESSIONS COVERING:
(I) UNEXPECTED CLINICAL SCENARIOS; AND
(II) ONCE ANNUAL REVIEW OF A SUBSET OF THE LICENSEE’S
ACTUAL CASES BY AN EXAMINER APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) A PHYSICIAN WHO HAS COMPLETED:
(I) ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL
EDUCATION ACCREDITED RESIDENCY TRAINING IN THE UNITED STATES; OR
(II) AMERICAN OSTEOPATHIC ASSOCIATION RESIDENCY
TRAINING OR ROYAL COLLEGE OF PHYSICIANS TRAINING IN CANADA; OR
(2) A PHYSICIAN WHO HAS PREVIOUSLY RESIDED IN OR HELD A
MEDICAL LICENSE FROM THE UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS,
OR CANADA.
(A) (C) (1) BEGINNING OCTOBER JANUARY 1, 2028, THE BOARD MAY
ISSUE A LIMITED LICENSE TO PRACTICE MEDICINE TO A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN A
COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS,
PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 598 5
(2) THE TERM OF A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED 3 YEARS.
(3) A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY THE BOARD UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT BE RENEWED.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD
THAT THE APPLICANT:
(D) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A LIMITED LICENSE, AN APPLICANT MUST:
(1) HAS HAVE RECEIVED A DEGREE OF DOCTOR OF MEDICINE OR ITS
EQUIVALENT FROM A LEGALLY CHARTERED MEDICAL SCHOOL OUTSIDE THE
UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA
THAT IS RECOGNIZED BY THE WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION WITH RECOGNIZED
ACCREDITATION STATUS FROM THE EDUCATIONAL COMMISSION FOR FOREIGN
MEDICAL GRADUATES;
(2) HAS COMPLETED AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF POSTGRADUATE
TRAINING IN THE COUNTRY IN WHICH THE APPLICANT IS LICENSED THAT IS
EQUIVALENT TO A POSTGRADUATE RESIDENCY PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE
ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(3) HAS BEEN LICENSED OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE IN A COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES, ITS TERRITORIES OR
POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA, AND HAS PRACTICED MEDICINE FOR AT
LEAST 5 OF THE 7 YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF APPLICATION;
(2) HAVE:
(I) COMPLETED AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF TRAINING IN A
RESIDENCY PROGRAM:
1. ACCREDITED BY THE ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR
GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION–I;
2. IN A COUNTRY WHOSE GRADUATE MEDICAL
EDUCATION ACCREDITING AGENCY HAS BEEN RECOGNIZED BY THE WORLD
FEDERATION FOR MEDICAL EDUCATION;
3. ACCREDITED BY THE COUNTRY’S GRADUATE
MEDICAL EDUCATION ACCREDITING AGENCY; OR

HOUSE BILL 598
4. ACCREDITED BY ANOTHER ACCREDITATION
AUTHORITY APPROVED BY THE BOARD; AND
(II) BEEN LICENSED OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE IN A FOREIGN COUNTRY FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS WITH A MEDICAL LICENSE
IN GOOD STANDING;
(3) HAVE PRACTICED MEDICINE IN A FOREIGN COUNTRY:
(I) FOR AT LEAST 3 OUT OF THE 10 YEARS IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE APPLICATION FOR A LIMITED LICENSE AFTER COMPLETION OF A
POST–GRADUATE INTERNSHIP OR RESIDENCY; OR
(II) FOR A PERIOD OF TIME DETERMINED BY THE BOARD ON A
CASE–BY–CASE BASIS;
(4) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE MEDICAL LICENSING OR
REGULATORY AUTHORITY IN THE COUNTRY OTHER THAN THE UNITED STATES, ITS
TERRITORIES OR POSSESSIONS, PUERTO RICO, OR CANADA WITH WHICH THE
BOARD, THE FEDERATION OF STATE MEDICAL BOARDS, OR ANOTHER NATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED MEDICAL STANDARDS OVERSIGHT ENTITY IS ABLE TO VERIFY THE
PHYSICIAN’S DISCIPLINE AND CRIMINAL BACKGROUND HISTORY;
(4) (I) HAVE BEEN IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE MEDICAL
LICENSING OR REGULATORY AUTHORITY OF THE FOREIGN COUNTRY AT THE TIME
OF DEPARTURE; OR
(II) WHEN REASONABLE EFFORTS TO SHOW GOOD STANDING
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM HAVE BEEN UNSUCCESSFUL, BE APPROVED BY THE
BOARD ON A CASE–BY–CASE BASIS;
(5) HAVE A VALID CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE EDUCATIONAL
COMMISSION FOR FOREIGN MEDICAL GRADUATES;
(5) (6) HAS HAVE NO PENDING DISCIPLINARY MATTERS BEFORE
ANY LICENSING OR REGULATORY BODY;
(6) HAS A VALID CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE EDUCATIONAL
COMMISSION FOR FOREIGN MEDICAL GRADUATES;
(7) HAS ACHIEVED A PASSING SCORE ON STEP 1, STEP 2 (CLINICAL
KNOWLEDGE), AND STEP 3 OF THE UNITED STATES MEDICAL LICENSING
EXAMINATION;

HOUSE BILL 598 7
(8) IS DOMICILED IN THE STATE;
(9) DEMONSTRATES ORAL AND WRITTEN COMPETENCY IN THE
ENGLISH LANGUAGE;
(10) (7) IS BE OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER;
(11) MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER §§ 14–309 AND 14–313 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(8) (I) 1. HAVE ACHIEVED A PASSING SCORE ON STEP 1, STEP
2, AND STEP 3 OF THE UNITED STATES MEDICAL LICENSING EXAMINATION; AND
2. SUBMIT EVIDENCE OF HAVING PASSED PART 1 OF
THE STATE STANDARDS OF CARE ASSESSMENT; OR
(II) 1. HAVE AN OFFER OF EMPLOYMENT FROM A FACILITY
APPROVED BY THE BOARD THAT WILL:
A. EVALUATE THE PHYSICIAN’S NONCLINICAL SKILLS
AND FAMILIARITY WITH STANDARDS APPROPRIATE FOR MEDICAL PRACTICE IN THE
STATE;
B. PROVIDE DIRECT CLINICAL OVERSIGHT FOR AN
INITIAL PERIOD FOLLOWED BY PROGRESSIVE AUTONOMY BASED ON
DEMONSTRATED COMPETENCE;
C. CONDUCT REGULAR CASE REVIEWS, CHART AUDITS,
AND DIRECT OBSERVATION;
D. SUBMIT BIANNUAL COMPETENCY EVALUATIONS TO
THE BOARD;
E. PROVIDE STRUCTURED SUPPORT TO ACCLIMATE THE
INTERNATIONALLY TRAINED PHYSICIAN TO U.S. MEDICAL LEGAL STANDARDS,
DOCUMENTATION PRACTICES, QUALITY METRICS, AND PATIENT COMMUNICATION
NORMS; AND
F. IMMEDIATELY REPORT ANY COMPETENCE OR
PROFESSIONALISM CONCERNS TO THE BOARD; AND
3. SUBMIT A STATEMENT TO THE BOARD THAT THE
APPLICANT AGREES TO:

HOUSE BILL 598
A. ENTER A FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT RELATIONSHIP
WITH THE FACILITY THAT HAS MADE THE OFFER OF EMPLOYMENT UNDER ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM; AND
B. PRACTICE MEDICINE SOLELY AT FACILITIES
OPERATED BY THE FACILITY AS AUTHORIZED BY THE LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED BY
THE BOARD FOR THE DURATION OF THE LIMITED LICENSE; AND
(12) (9) HAS SATISFIED SATISFY ANY OTHER CRITERIA
ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD FOR ISSUANCE OF A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(C) (E) THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE AN APPLICANT INELIGIBLE FOR
LICENSURE IF THE APPLICANT HAD:
(1) A HAD A PREVIOUS DISCIPLINARY ACTION; OR
(2) DISCIPLINE HAD DISCIPLINE OR COMPETENCY ISSUES DURING
THE APPLICANT’S POSTGRADUATE TRAINING; OR
(3) DOES NOT SUBMIT EVIDENCE ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD THAT
THE APPLICANT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (F) THE BOARD MAY REVOKE A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED UNDER
THIS SECTION IF:
(1) THE LICENSEE HAS PRACTICED OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE
LIMITED LICENSE;
(2) THE LICENSEE’S EMPLOYMENT IS TERMINATED;
(3) THE LICENSEE PRACTICES MEDICINE OUTSIDE THE STATE,
UNLESS LICENSED BY THE OTHER STATE;
(3) (4) THE LICENSEE HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF A DISCIPLINARY
ACTION BY THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR THE BOARD; OR
(4) (5) THE LICENSEE IS NO LONGER ELIGIBLE FOR THE LIMITED
LICENSE.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS:

HOUSE BILL 598 9
(1) TO ESTABLISH MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS AND APPLICATION
FEES FOR A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) TO ESTABLISH CONDITIONS APPLICABLE TO A LICENSEE;
(3) TO PROVIDE A PATHWAY TO FULL LICENSURE AFTER THE
LICENSEE SUCCESSFULLY SATISFIES ANY LICENSE CONDITIONS ESTABLISHED BY
THE BOARD UNDER ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(4) NECESSARY FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION, ADMINISTRATION, AND
ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION.
(G) A HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE WHO MEETS THE CRITERIA
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(8)(I) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY NOT ENGAGE IN SOLO PRACTICE;
(2) SHALL PRACTICE IN AFFILIATION WITH A COMMUNITY SPONSOR
APPROVED BY THE BOARD THAT HAS AGREED TO:
(I) SUBMIT A SUPERVISION AND INTEGRATION PLAN
APPROVED BY THE BOARD DEMONSTRATING CAPACITY TO PROVIDE:
1. STRUCTURED CLINICAL OVERSIGHT;
2. ACCESS TO ELECTRONIC HEALTH RECORDS AND
QUALITY ASSURANCE SYSTEMS;
3. TRAINING ON U.S. STANDARDS OF CARE, RISK
MANAGEMENT, AND REGULATORY COMPLIANCE; AND
4. OPPORTUNITIES FOR SKILL DEVELOPMENT AND
PEER REVIEW;
(II) PROVIDE DIRECT CLINICAL OVERSIGHT FOR AN INITIAL
PERIOD FOLLOWED BY PROGRESSIVE AUTONOMY BASED ON DEMONSTRATED
COMPETENCE;
(III) CONDUCT REGULAR CASE REVIEWS, CHART AUDITS, AND
DIRECT OBSERVATION;
(IV) SUBMIT BIANNUAL COMPETENCY EVALUATIONS TO THE
BOARD;

HOUSE BILL 598
(V) PROVIDE STRUCTURED SUPPORT TO ACCLIMATE THE
INTERNATIONALLY TRAINED PHYSICIAN TO U.S. MEDICAL LEGAL STANDARDS,
DOCUMENTATION PRACTICES, QUALITY METRICS, AND PATIENT COMMUNICATION
NORMS; AND
(VI) IMMEDIATELY REPORT ANY COMPETENCE OR
PROFESSIONALISM CONCERNS TO THE BOARD; AND
(3) MAY NOT SUPERVISE PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS, RESIDENTS, OR
MEDICAL STUDENTS.
(H) A HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE MAY APPLY FOR A LICENSE UNDER §
14–309 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE HOLDER OF THE LIMITED LICENSE SUBMITS TO
THE BOARD:
(1) FOR A HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE WHO MEETS THE CRITERIA
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(8)(I) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) ENDORSEMENTS BY TWO PHYSICIANS LICENSED IN THE
STATE, AT LEAST ONE OF WHOM IS NOT IN PRACTICE WITH THE HOLDER OF THE
LIMITED LICENSE; AND
(II) EVIDENCE OF HAVING PASSED PART 2 OF THE STATE
STANDARD OF CARE ASSESSMENT; OR
(2) FOR A HOLDER OF A LIMITED LICENSE WHO MEETS THE CRITERIA
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(8)(II) OF THIS SECTION, EVIDENCE OF:
(I) SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE FACILITY’S
EVALUATION, WITH AN ATTESTATION FROM THE FACILITY’S CHIEF MEDICAL
OFFICER OR A PHYSICIAN IN AN EQUIVALENT POSITION THAT THE HOLDER OF THE
LIMITED LICENSE IS COMPETENT TO PRACTICE INDEPENDENTLY; AND
(II) 1. ACHIEVEMENT OF A PASSING SCORE ON STEP 3 OF
THE UNITED STATES MEDICAL LICENSING EXAMINATION; OR
2. HAVING PASSED PARTS 1 AND 2 OF THE STATE
STANDARD OF CARE ASSESSMENT.
(I) THE BOARD MAY:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION,
ADMINISTRATION, AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS SECTION;

HOUSE BILL 598 11
(2) CONDUCT SITE VISITS OR AUDITS OF COMMUNITY SPONSORS; AND
(3) REQUIRE REMEDIATION OR MODIFY SUPERVISION REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION IF DEFICIENCIES ARE IDENTIFIED.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the State Board of Physicians shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the
House Health Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on:
(1) the status of the Board’s preparations to begin accepting applications
for a limited license under § 14–308 of the Health Occupations Article, as enacted by Section
2 of this Act; and
(2) if the Board is unable to meet the January 1, 2028, deadline to begin
accepting applications, the reason it is unable to comply with the deadline and the projected
date when it will begin accepting applications.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that:
(1) on or before July 1, 2027, Johns Hopkins University School of Medicine,
the University of Maryland School of Medicine, and the Meritus School of Osteopathic
Medicine, in collaboration with other facilities, as defined under § 14–308(a)(2) of the
Health Occupations Article, as enacted under Section 2 of this Act, shall develop the State
standard of care assessment described in § 14–308(a)(5) of the Health Occupations Article,
as enacted under Section 2 of this Act, for review by the State Board of Physicians and to
be administered by the facilities, including a method for examiners to notify the Board if a
candidate’s exam performance indicates that the candidate is practicing in a manner that
may put patients at risk or should otherwise prompt an investigation by the Board;
(2) the entities described in item (1) of this section shall establish an entity
to serve as the examiner described in § 14–308(a)(5)(ii) of the Health Occupations Article,
as enacted under Section 2 of this Act; and
(3) the State Board of Physicians shall consult with MedChi, the Maryland
State Medical Society, on the development of policies and regulations implementing Section
1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.